Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-520.03
Sections, how construed.

Sections 25-520.01 to 25-520.03 are intended by the Legislature to be cumulative and supplemental to existing legislation. They are deemed to be a matter of general statewide concern. Such sections apply to all parties authorized by law to give notice by publication, including the State of Nebraska, its governmental subdivisions, and all public and municipal corporations.

Laws 1957, c. 80, § 3, p. 326.

The act, of which this section is a part, is not amendatory, but is new and independent legislation. Farmers Co-op. Mercantile Co. v. Sidner, 175 Neb. 94, 120 N.W.2d 537 (1963).